Hawaii statutes.
CHAPTER
342L

UNDERGROUND
STORAGE TANKS

Part I. Definitions and General Provisions

Section

342L-1 Definitions

342L-2 Administration

342L-3 Powers; rulemaking; appointment of
hearings officers

342L-4 Permits; procedures for

342L-4.5 Permits near shoreline prohibited;
exception

342L-5 Variances allowed

342L-6 Variances; procedures for

342L-7 Authority to obtain information and data,
inspect, and

require and conduct activities; penalties
for

disclosure

342L-7.5 Record maintenance

342L-8 Enforcement

342L-9 Emergency powers; procedures

342L-10 Penalties

342L-11 Administrative penalties

342L-11.5 Repealed

342L-12 Injunctive and other relief

342L-12.5 Intervention

342L-13 Appeal

342L-14 Fees

342L-15 Public records; confidential information

342L-16 Nonliability of department personnel

342L-17 Other action not barred

342L-18 Enforcement by state and county
authorities

342L-19 Other powers of department not affected

342L-20 Effect of laws, ordinances, and rules

342L-21 Priority in courts

342L-22 Repealed

342L-23 Directory of underground storage tank
service

providers

Part II. Underground Storage Tank
Regulation

342L-30 Notification requirements

342L-31 Permit requirements and transfer of permit

342L-32 Standards for tanks and tank systems

342L-32.5 Delivery, deposit, and acceptance
prohibition

342L-33 Release detection

342L-34 Reporting of releases

342L-35 Response to suspected or confirmed
releases

342L-36 Financial responsibility

342L-36.5 Repealed

342L-37 Underground storage tank and tank system
change in

service and closure requirements

Part III. Department Response Program for
Petroleum

Releases

342L-50 Definitions

342L-51 Leaking underground storage tank fund

342L-52 Response to suspected or confirmed
releases

342L-53 Cost recovery

Part IV. Fuel Tank Advisory Committee

342L-61 Fuel tank advisory committee; established;
composition

342L-62 Duties

Cross References

Environmental courts, jurisdiction over proceedings arising
under this chapter, see §604A-2.

Law Journals and Reviews

Liability Insurance Coverage for Pollution Claims. 12 UH L.
Rev. 83.

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next